src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON persplobl !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Abl:лысь WordEnd ;
+Dat:лы WordEnd ;
+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;

+Ins:ӧн WordEnd ;
+Com:кӧд WordEnd ;
+Car:тӧг WordEnd ;
+Cns:ла WordEnd ;
+Cmpr:ся WordEnd ;
+Ine:ын WordEnd ;
+Ela:ысь WordEnd ;
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ;
+Apr:лань WordEnd ;
+Egr:сянь WordEnd ;
+Prl:ӧд WordEnd ;
+Tra:ті WordEnd ;
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ;
+AprIne:ланьын WordEnd ;  ! New cases in last grammar  
+AprEla:ланьысь WordEnd ;  ! 
+AprIll:ланьӧ WordEnd ; ! 
+AprEgr:ланьсянь WordEnd ; ! 
+AprPrl:ланьӧд WordEnd ; !
+AprTra:ланьті WordEnd ; !       
+AprTer:ланьӧдз WordEnd ; ! 


! These ones to be removed:
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-ACC
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-COM
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-DAT
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-GEN
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-NOM
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-ACC
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-COM
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Com: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-DAT
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-GEN
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-NOM
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-ACC
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-COM
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-DAT
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-ELA
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-GEN
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-NOM
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-ACC
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-DAT
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-ELA
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-GEN
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-NOM ! tähän tulee ме
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-ACC
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-COM
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-DAT
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-ELA
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ela: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-GEN
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-NOM
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-ABL
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-ACC
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-COM
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-DAT
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-ELA
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-GEN
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-NOM
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-ABL
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: WordEnd ;
! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-OBL
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat:%>лы WordEnd ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl:%>лысь WordEnd ;


!Interrogative pronouns serve as the base of interrogative, relative, indefinite and distributional pronouns.

LEXICON PRON-HUM
+Sg+Nom:і WordEnd ;
+Pl+Nom:ъяс WordEnd ;
+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Sg: PRON-HUM-OBL ;
+Pl:ъяс PRON-HUM-OBL ;
: PRON-HUM-COLL ;
!код, коді

LEXICON PRON-HUM-OBL
! 2000: 187
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
+Abl:лысь WordEnd ; !
+Dat:лы WordEnd ;
+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc3:сӧ WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн WordEnd ;
+Com:кӧд WordEnd ;
+Car:тӧг WordEnd ;
+Cns:ла WordEnd ;
+Ine:ын WordEnd ;
+Ela:ысь WordEnd ; 
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ; !
+Apr:лань WordEnd ;
+Egr:сянь WordEnd ;
+Tra:ті WordEnd ;
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL
+Coll:нан PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
+ZeroColl: PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
!
+ZeroColl+Acc2+PxPl2:ныдтӧ WordEnd ;
+Coll+Acc2+PxPl2:наннытӧ WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS
+PxPl1:ным PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl2:ныд PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl3:ныс PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
!
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc2+PxPl2:нытӧ WordEnd ;
+Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES
+Nom: WordEnd ;
 PRON-HUM-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-NONHUM
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ; !
+Abl:лысь WordEnd ; !
+Dat:лы WordEnd ; !
+ZeroAcc: WordEnd ;
+Acc3:сӧ WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн WordEnd ;
+Com:кӧд WordEnd ;
+Car:тӧг WordEnd ;
+Cmpr:ся WordEnd ;
+Cns:ла WordEnd ;
+Ine:ын WordEnd ;
+Ela:ысь WordEnd ; 
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ; !
+Apr:лань WordEnd ;
+Egr:сянь WordEnd ;
+Prl:ӧд WordEnd ;
+Tra:ті WordEnd ;
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ;

! Removing 2012-02-08 The comparative can be taken care of once
! LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF_COMPARISON
! +Comp:%>джык INTERR-REL ;
!               INTERR-REL ;

LEXICON Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON EgrIll4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Egr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Tra4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Pron+Tra: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON TraEgr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Tra+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Ter4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ter: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF ! 3 types of pronouns are congregated here
 PRON-INDEFTAG ; ! This leads to a variety of indefinite pronouns
 INTERR-REL ; ! This leads to a split between relative and interrogative pronouns

LEXICON INTERR-REL
+Interr: COMPARATIVE ;
+Rel: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEFTAG
+Der/кӧ+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ;


! Indefinite pronouns
 
LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG
+Pron+Indef: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG-KO
+Pron+Indef: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX
+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Abl:%>лысь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Dat:%>лы PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Ins:%>ӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Ela:%>ысь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Egr:%>сянь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END
:%>кӧ K ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG-SJURO
+Pron+Indef: PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-CX
+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Abl:%>лысь PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Dat:%>лы PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Ins:%>ӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Ela:%>ысь PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;
+Egr:%>сянь PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-END
:%>сюрӧ K ;
 !indefinite pronouns from the interrogative/relative pronouns.


LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-KO
+Pron+Der/кӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO
+Pron+Der/сюрӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INTERR
+Pron+Interr: K ;

!LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-END
!+Der/сюрӧ:%>сюрӧ WordEnd ;

!LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO
!+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Dat:%>лы PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;


!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON-SPAT
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Spat: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR
+Pron+Recipr: PRON-RECIPR-CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR-CASE
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+Cmpl+PxSg2:ыд K ;
+Cmpl+PxSg2:ыс K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl1:ным K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl2:ныд K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl3:ныс K ;
+Gen:лӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:ныслысь K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:ныслы K ;
+Acc:ӧс K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc2+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;
+Acc3:сӧ K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl2:ныдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl3:ныскӧд K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
+Ela:ысь K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; ! Here is a good problem: Should there be a special tag
                ! for the illative-inessive forms
+Ill+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;


LEXICON PRON-REL
+Pron+Rel: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR
+Pron+Refl+Der/ладор: Noun1 ; !2011-11-22

LEXICON REFL_AS !! * = @CODE@ ас:а 
+A+Refl:с ABS_ ; !ас is an absolute-form modifer
+Pron+Refl:  REFL_AS-01 ;
