src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
ас:а REFL_AS  "oma" ;
асладор:асладор PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR  "" ;
кодкӧ:код PRONINDEFTAG-KO  "joku" ;
кодсюрӧ:код PRONINDEFTAG-SJURO  "joku" ;
коді:код PRON-REL  "joka" ;
кутшӧм-некутшӧм:кутшӧм-некутшӧм PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кутшӧм-сэтшӧм:кутшӧм-сэтшӧм PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кутшӧмакӧ:кутшӧмакӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кутшӧмасӧкӧ:кутшӧмасӧкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кутшӧмкӧ:кутшӧмкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "jonkinlainen" ;
кутшӧмсюрӧ:кутшӧмсюрӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO  "jonkinlainen" ;
кутшӧмтор:кутшӧмторй PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кыдзи-мый:кыдзи-мый INTERR-REL  "" ;
кыдзкӧ:кыдзкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кыдзсюрӧ:кыдзсюрӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO  "" ;
кымынкӧ:кымынкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "muutama" ;
кымыныськӧ:кымыныськӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кыссюрӧ:кыссюрӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO  "" ;
кыськӧ:кыськӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jostakin" ;
кысянь:кысянь Egr4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кысянькӧ:кысянькӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кыткӧ:кыткӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кытчаньӧ:кытчаньӧ EgrIll4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кытчӧ:кытчӧ Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "minne" ;
кытчӧдз:кытчӧдз Ter4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "kunnes" ;
кытчӧдзкӧ:кытчӧдзкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кытчӧкӧ:кытчӧкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jonnekin" ;
кытчӧкӧ:кытчӧкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кытчӧсюрӧ:кытчӧсюрӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO  "" ;
кытчӧясӧкӧ:кытчӧясӧкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кытыськӧ:кытыськӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jostain" ;
кытысянькӧ:кытысянькӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кыті:кыті Tra4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кытісянь:кытісянь TraEgr4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кытӧнкӧ:кытӧнкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
кытӧнсюрӧ:кытӧнсюрӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO  "" ;
кӧн-мый:кӧн-мый INTERR-REL  "" ;
кӧнкӧ:кӧнкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jossain" ;
кӧнкӧ:кӧнкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кӧнкӧ-кӧнкӧ:кӧнкӧ-кӧнкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кӧнсюрӧ:кӧнсюрӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO  "" ;
кӧнъясынкӧ:кӧнъясынкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
мыетш:мыетш INTERR-REL  "minkä verran" ;
мыетшкӧ:мыетшкӧ IS_PRON-INDEF-KO  "" ;
мый:мый PRON-RECIPR  "" ;
мый-нибудь:мый-нибудь PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйдакӧ:мыйдакӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйкӧ:мый PRONINDEFTAG-KO  "jokin" ;
мыйлакӧ:мыйлакӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jostain syystä" ;
мыйтакӧ:мыйтакӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jonkin verran" ;
мыйтӧмкӧ:мыйтӧмкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйя:мыйя PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйяскӧ:мыйяскӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мӧда-мӧд:мӧда-мӧд PRON-RECIPR  "" ;
ӧта-мӧд:ӧта-мӧд PRON-RECIPR  "toisensa" ;
ӧти-мӧд:ӧти-мӧд PRON-RECIPR  "" ;
